Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 6 Default
§ 28-9-625. Remedies for secured party’s failure to comply with chapter.

If it is established that a secured party is not proceeding in accordance with this chapter, a court may order or restrain collection, enforcement or disposition of collateral on appropriate terms and conditions.

Subject to subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a person is liable for damages in the amount of any loss caused by a failure to comply with this chapter. Loss caused by a failure to comply may include loss resulting from the debtor’s inability to obtain, or increased costs of, alternative financing.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-628[, Idaho Code]:

A person that, at the time of the failure, was a debtor, was an obligor, or held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral may recover damages under subsection (b) of this section for its loss; and

If the collateral is consumer goods, a person that was a debtor or a secondary obligor at the time a secured party failed to comply with this part may recover for that failure in any event, an amount not less than the credit service charge plus ten percent (10%) of the principal amount of the obligation or the time price differential plus ten percent (10%) of the cash price.

A debtor whose deficiency is eliminated under section 28-9-626[, Idaho Code,] may recover damages for the loss of any surplus. However, a debtor or secondary obligor whose deficiency is eliminated or reduced under section 28-9-626[, Idaho Code,] may not otherwise recover under subsection (b) of this section for noncompliance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance.

In addition to any damages recoverable under subsection (b) of this section, the debtor, consumer obligor or person named as a debtor in a filed record, as applicable, may recover one hundred dollars ($100) in each case from a person that:

Files a record that the person is not entitled to file under section 28-9-509(a)[, Idaho Code];

Fails to cause the secured party of record to file or send a termination statement as required by section 28-9-513(a) or (c)[, Idaho Code].

If a secured party fails to comply with a request regarding a list of collateral or a statement of account under section 28-9-210[, Idaho Code], the secured party may claim a security interest only as shown in the statement included in the request as against a person that is reasonably misled by the failure.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-625, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-626. Action in which deficiency or surplus is in issue.

In an action arising from a transaction in which the amount of a deficiency or surplus is in issue, the following rules apply:

A secured party need not prove compliance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance unless the debtor or a secondary obligor places the secured party’s compliance in issue.

If the secured party’s compliance is placed in issue, the secured party has the burden of establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance was conducted in accordance with this part.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-628[, Idaho Code], if a secured party fails to prove that the collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance was conducted in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance, the liability of a debtor or a secondary obligor for a deficiency is limited to an amount by which the sum of the secured obligation, expenses and attorney’s fees exceeds the greater of:

The proceeds of the collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance; or

The amount of proceeds that would have been realized had the noncomplying secured party proceeded in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance.

For purposes of subsection (c)(2) of this section, the amount of proceeds that would have been realized is equal to the sum of the secured obligation, expenses and attorney’s fees unless the secured party proves that the amount is less than that sum.

If a deficiency or surplus is calculated under section 28-9-615(f)[, Idaho Code], the debtor or obligor has the burden of establishing that the amount of proceeds of the disposition is significantly below the range of prices that a complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-626, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2002, ch. 107, § 5, p. 290.

§ 28-9-627. Determination of whether conduct was commercially reasonable.

The fact that a greater amount could have been obtained by a collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance at a different time or in a different method from that selected by the secured party is not of itself sufficient to preclude the secured party from establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance was made in a commercially reasonable manner.

A disposition of collateral is made in a commercially reasonable manner if the disposition is made:

In the usual manner on any recognized market;

At the price current in any recognized market at the time of the disposition; or

Otherwise in conformity with reasonable commercial practices among dealers in the type of property that was the subject of the disposition.

A collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance is commercially reasonable if it has been approved:

In a judicial proceeding;

By a bona fide creditors’ committee;

By a representative of creditors; or

By an assignee for the benefit of creditors.

Approval under subsection (c) of this section need not be obtained, and lack of approval does not mean that the collection, enforcement, disposition or acceptance is not commercially reasonable.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-627, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-628. Nonliability and limitation on liability of secured party — Liability of secondary obligor.

Unless a secured party knows that a person is a debtor or obligor, knows the identity of the person, and knows how to communicate with the person:

The secured party is not liable to the person, or to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against the person, for failure to comply with this chapter; and

The secured party’s failure to comply with this chapter does not affect the liability of the person for a deficiency.

A secured party is not liable because of its status as secured party:

To a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless the secured party knows:

that the person is a debtor or obligor;

the identity of the person; and

how to communicate with the person; or

To a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows:

that the person is a debtor; and

the identity of the person.

A secured party is not liable to any person, and a person’s liability for a deficiency is not affected, because of any act or omission arising out of the secured party’s reasonable belief that a transaction is not a consumer goods transaction or a consumer transaction or that goods are not consumer goods, if the secured party’s belief is based on its reasonable reliance on:

A debtor’s representation concerning the purpose for which collateral was to be used, acquired or held; or

An obligor’s representation concerning the purpose for which a secured obligation was incurred.

A secured party is not liable to any person under section 28-9-625(c)(2)[, Idaho Code,] for its failure to comply with section 28-9-616[, Idaho Code].

A secured party is not liable under section 28-9-625(c)(2)[, Idaho Code,] more than once with respect to any one (1) secured obligation.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-628, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 708.